Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 15 Capital Construction Projects
§ 21-15-111.
Definitions.

As used in this act, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Capital construction account” or “school capital construction account” means the account into which revenues are deposited pursuant to W.S. 9-4-601(a)(vii), (b)(i) and (iv), into which the proceeds from any revenue bonds are credited under W.S.

21-15-108

, and into which any other funds are appropriated to the account for purposes of this act. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the account. Funds within the account shall be expended only for purposes of and in the manner prescribed by this act;

“Commission” means the school facilities commission created by this act;

“Local enhancements to school buildings and facilities” or “local enhancements” means any renovation, construction, replacement, repair or other improvement of or to any school building or facility initiated by a school district which is designed to bring the building or facility to a condition exceeding the statewide building adequacy standards;

“Project” means replacement, renovation or new construction projects which increase the value of the school building or facility by improving the functioning of the building or facility or the capacity of the building or facility, or both, excluding major building and facility repair and replacement defined under W.S.

21-15-109

(a)(iii) and routine maintenance and repair defined under W.S.

21-15-109

(a)(vi);

“Remedy” or “remediation” means a course of action addressing identified building and facility needs in accordance with statewide adequacy standards developed under this act, consisting of building or facility construction, replacement, renovation, repair or any combination thereof;

“School buildings and facilities” mean the physical structures and the land upon which the structures are situated, which are primarily used in connection with or for the purpose of providing the educational programs offered by a school district in compliance with law, including both student-related and nonstudent-related buildings and facilities;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 93, § 2.

“This act” means W.S.

21-15-108

, 21-15-109 and

21-15-111

through

21-15-123

;

“Department” means the state construction department created by W.S.

9-2-3001

.

through (q) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 3.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 170, § 301; 2001, ch. 159, §§ 1, 2; ch. 191, § 1; ch. 192, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 99, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 98, § 2; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 204, § 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i) deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “means the account.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “needs in accordance with statewide adequacy standards developed under this act” for “inadequacies pursuant to this act” in (a)(v), repealed former (a)(vii) which read: “ ‘School district building advisory committee’ means the committee organized by the school district board of trustees as required by the statewide adequacy standards established under W.S. 21-15-107(a), for purposes of developing and planning district school building and facility needs”.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a)(i) inserted “and 21 13 306(c),” preceding “into which”, deleted “and in addition to” preceding “any other funds” and inserted “are” thereafter, and in (a)(viii) substituted “21-15-122” for “21-15-121”.

Laws 2009, ch. 98, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 2, 2009.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “unless the context requires otherwise”;
in (a)(viii), substituted “21-15-123” for “21-15-122”; added (a)(ix), and made related change.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, rewrote (a)(ix), which formerly read, “‘Department’ means the school facilities department created by this act.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted “and 21-13-306(c)” preceding “into which the proceeds” and made two related changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i), substituted “W.S. 9-4-601(a)(vii)” for “W.S. 9-4-305(b) and 9-4-601(a)(vii).”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) added the second sentence.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 301, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates $272,039,538 from the budget reserve account to the public school capital construction account created by W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i). Of this appropriation, $21,154,396 is to be appropriated effective immediately.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Generally. —

School districts are not required to have reached bonded indebtedness of ninety percent or more of their constitutional debt limitation imposed under art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const., in order to receive state assistance for those capital construction projects identified in the department of education's study of school construction needs. Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2004).

Stated

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 21-15-112.
Leasing of real property.

At the request of the school facilities commission, any school district shall lease any land, building, or fixture from the nonprofit corporation approved by the state building commission pursuant to 1997 Wyoming session laws, chapter 94, section 3, as amended by 1998 Wyoming session laws, chapter 35, subject to the following conditions:

The lease shall be terminable, without penalty, at the sole option of the lessee;

Any option to purchase under the lease shall be at the sole discretion of the lessee;

The financing for the land, building, or fixture to be leased under the lease may only involve private funds and may not involve the creation of any indebtedness or debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation;

The lessee shall not pledge the lessee’s full faith and credit for any payments under the lease or any financing thereof;

The obligations of the lessee under the lease shall constitute a special obligation of the lessee and may be paid only from sources authorized by the legislative body of the lessee and may be terminated, without penalty or recourse against the lessee, in the event that the legislative body of the lessee fails to appropriate sufficient funds to meet the financial obligations under the lease;

No bonds or other obligations of the lessor shall constitute an indebtedness, legal, moral or otherwise, result in a pecuniary obligation, legal, moral or otherwise, or constitute a pledge of or charge, legal, moral or otherwise, against the faith or credit of the lessor, the state, any department, agency, board, commission or political subdivision of the state, any instrumentality of any of the foregoing or any public body corporate or other public body created by or pursuant to the constitution or statutes of the state;

The obligations of the lessee to make any payments due under the lease in any fiscal year shall be limited to funds appropriated by the legislative body of the lessee for that fiscal year and no appropriation by the legislative body of the lessor of funds to make payments due under the lease for any fiscal year shall constitute, or be construed to create, any obligation, legal, moral or otherwise, by the lessee to appropriate funds to make any payments due under the lease for any other fiscal year or constitute an indebtedness, legal, moral or otherwise, result in a pecuniary obligation, legal, moral or otherwise, or constitute a pledge of or charge, legal, moral or otherwise, against the faith or credit of the lessor, the state, any department, agency, board, commission or political subdivision of the state, any instrumentality of any of the foregoing or any public body corporate or other public body created by or pursuant to the constitution or statutes of the state; and

The lease shall provide that all bonds or any other obligations of the lessor relating to the land, building, or fixture to be leased under the lease contain disclaimers describing the limitations set forth in paragraphs (i) through (vii) of this subsection.

For purposes of this section, the legislative body:

Of the state, any department, agency, board or commission of the state or any instrumentality of any of the foregoing is the state legislature;

Of any school district is the board of trustees of such school district.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 170, § 301; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 2; 2014 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “or fixture” for “equipment or other capital asset” in (a), (a)(iii) and (a)(viii).

§ 21-15-113.
School facilities commission; membership; conflict of interest; terms; chairman; meetings; compensation.

The school facilities commission is established to consist of eight (8) members comprised of the state superintendent of public instruction,who shall serve in an ex-officio, nonvoting capacity, and seven (7) members who are Wyoming residents appointed by the governor with one (1) member appointed from each of the seven (7) appointment districts designated in W.S. 9-1-218(b). Four (4) of the appointees shall have knowledge and experience in the following areas:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 3.

Building and facility engineering, construction and operations;

Building design and specifications;

Estimating, bidding and building construction;

School district administration.

Commission members appointed under subsection (a) of this section shall not be an employee of any educational association or organization. In addition, not more than one (1) commission member shall be an employee of a school district. Commission members shall be subject to W.S.

16-6-118

and shall not vote or otherwise participate in any matter as prohibited under W.S.

16-6-118

.

Gubernatorial appointments shall be subject to senate approval and shall serve a term of four (4) years beginning March 1. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the appointed members shall be of the same political party. The governor shall fill a vacancy on respective appointments to the commission in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

, and may remove appointed commissioners as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

.

The governor shall designate a chairman from commission appointments, who shall hold office for the length of his term or until a successor is designated, whichever first occurs. The commission shall meet not less than quarterly and a majority of the voting membership constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business.

Appointed commissioners shall receive one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per day as salary for attendance at commission meetings and conducting official commission business, and shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties in the same manner and amount as state employees.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2011, ch. 2, §§ 2, 3; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “eight (8)” for “seven (7),” inserted “who shall serve in an ex-officio, nonvoting capacity,” substituted “seven (7)” for “six (6),” substituted “by the governor with one (1) member appointed from each of the seven (7) appointment districts designated in W.S. 9-1-218(b)” for “as follows,” and added the last sentence; repealed former (a)(i) and (a)(ii) pertaining to appointments by governor and by state superintendant of public instruction; added (a)(iii) through (a)(vi); and in (c), deleted “and state superintendent” following “Gubernatorial,” deleted “and the state superintendent” following “The governor” in the second sentence, deleted “respectively” preceding “appointed commissioners” in the second sentence, and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “For purposes of this subsection, appointments by the state superintendent shall be subject to this subsection in the same manner provided for gubernatorial appointments under W.S.

9-1-202

,

28-12-101

and

28-12-102

.”

The 2013 amendment,

in (a), substituted “nine (9)” for “eight (8)”, and added “and the director of the department of education”.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “eight (8)” for “nine (9),” deleted “and the director of the department of education” and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%)” for “four (4)” in the second sentence of (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

School facilities commission. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 6, provides:

“(a)

Notwithstanding W.S.

21-15-113

as created under section 1 of this act, the terms of initial appointments to the school facilities commission shall commence upon appointment, with three (3) of the six (6) initial appointments appointed to a term of two (2) years and the remaining initial appointments appointed to a term of four (4) years.

“(b)

Notwithstanding W.S. 28-11-103, as created under section 1 of this act, the terms of initial appointments to the select committee on school facilities shall commence upon appointment.”

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 8(a) makes § 6 of the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 22, 2002.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, amending provisions of this article, states in relevant part: “in accordance with Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014)”.

§ 21-15-114.
School facilities commission powers and duties.

The school facilities commission shall:

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 3.

Adopt policies, guidelines and standards for any assessment of school buildings and facilities under W.S.

21-15-117

;

Adopt policies, guidelines and standards for school district facility plans required under W.S.

21-15-116

and review and approve each plan as required under this act;

through (vi) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 3.

Develop policies and criteria for use in determining renovation, replacement or discontinuation of inadequate buildings and facilities based upon statewide adequacy standards and other requirements necessary to ensure adequate, efficient and cost effective school buildings and facilities;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 3.

Establish criteria and procedures for the identification of local enhancements to school buildings and facilities which are in excess of state building adequacy standards and develop criteria and procedures to determine whether and how any local enhancements should be incorporated into the statewide adequacy standards;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 3.

Establish a process under which prototypes are developed for remedies addressing building and facility needs identified under this act through building and facility replacement. Prototypes shall be assembled based upon:

Capacity requirements of the building or facility and projected student populations to be attending programs in the building or facility;

Educational programs to be provided within the building or facility, provided that this subparagraph shall not be construed to grant the commission any authority to specify the educational programs offered by any district;

Accommodations, in coordination and cooperation with the district, to the proposed site on which the building or facility is to be constructed, including specific site requirements and limitations.

Develop criteria and procedures for the site analysis of remedies responding to identified building and facility needs by building and facility replacement. Site analysis shall include a comprehensive review and evaluation of site soil conditions, traffic patterns, utilities and site topography;

and (xiv) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 3.

With prior consultation with the select committee on school facilities, promulgate necessary rules and regulations to administer and implement this act.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 2, § 3.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2004, ch. 113, § 1; 2005, ch. 222, § 1; 2006, ch. 42, § 1, ch. 98, § 2; 2008, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; ch. 116, § 1; 2011, ch. 2, §§ 2, 3; 2021 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(x), inserted “including the allocation of revenues resulting from the disposition of property rendered surplus to offset property demolition costs” at the end of the second sentence, rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “Any revenues considered pursuant to W.S. 21-13-310(a)(xiv) or (xv) shall not be counted under this paragraph,” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

added (a)(xiv), and redesignated former (a)(xiv) as (a)(xv).

Laws 2005, ch. 222, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment by ch. 42, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, in (a), deleted “five (5) year” following “approved” in (xiii) and substituted “facility” for “five (5) year” in two places in (xiv).

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2006, added (a)(viii)(J).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 93, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2008, in (a)(i), substituted “school districts” for “the local school boards”, substituted “architects” for “the district's architect”; in (a)(iii), deleted “of each district” after “plans required”, substituted “a plan for each district” for “each district's plan”; in the first sentence of (a)(viii), added “or approve”, deleted “with school districts” at the end; in (a)(viii)(C) deleted “by the district with further approval by the commission” at the end of (I), repealed former (II) which read: “The commission may delegate in whole or in part, the approval of changes and change orders to its staff”; repealed former (a)(viii)(F) which pertained to approval of all general contracts for construction or renovation project; added “or projects” at the end of (a)(viii)(G); substituted “needs” for “inadequacies” in the first sentences of (a)(xi) and (a)(xii); in (a)(xiii), substituted “Provide for the” for “Review and approve any proposed” at the beginning, deleted the former last sentence which pertained to reimbursement.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, § 1, effective March 13, 2008, made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iii), substituted “approve each” for “certify a” and deleted “for each district” preceding “as required under this act”; and repealed former (a)(i), (a)(iv), (a)(v), (a)(vi), (a)(viii), (a)(x), (a)(xiii), (a)(xiv), (b) and (c), pertaining to powers and duties of the commission.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(ii), substituted "any" for "the comprehensive," deleted "required" following "facilities" and substituted "21-15-117" for "21-15-115."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-15-111(a)(viii).

§ 21-15-115.
Statewide standards for school building and facility adequacy.

The commission shall by rule and regulation establish and maintain uniform statewide standards for the adequacy of school buildings and facilities necessary for providing educational programs prescribed by law for the public schools. If a building owned by a district meets the applicable standards under this subsection for use by the district to educate students and was previously used for the purpose of educating students, no municipal or county zoning requirements shall be construed or applied so as to prevent the district from using the building for the purpose of educating students, or to require the district to make any modification to the building as a condition of using the building for the purpose of educating students. The uniform standards shall at minimum include:

Requirements for educating students in a safe environment including all applicable building, health, safety and environmental codes and standards required by law for all public buildings;

Building site requirements;

Building performance standards and guidelines including energy efficiency criteria;

Assurances for the special needs of identified student populations including children with disabilities;

Standards for educational space to allow the delivery of the required educational programs;

Building capacity criteria aligned to the prescribed state educational program, with consideration given to utilization differences between school sizes and school levels in accordance with W.S. 21-15-117(e)(iv);

Technological capacity criteria sufficient to meet required educational program needs and the requirements imposed under the state education technology plan;

Building and facility accessibility.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 131, § 2.

The commission shall not less than once every four (4) years, review and evaluate the building and facility adequacy standards established under subsection (a) of this section. Review and evaluation of the standards shall include the identification of local enhancements to buildings and facilities during this review and evaluation period, and based upon criteria and procedures developed by the commission, a determination as to whether and how any local enhancements should be incorporated into the statewide standards. The review and evaluation under this subsection shall extend to components of the annual evaluation of school buildings, the facility remediation schedules and the needs prioritization process established by the commission under W.S.

21-15-117

. Findings and recommendations pursuant to this subsection shall be reported to the select committee on school facilities before the next convening date of the legislative session immediately following completion of the review and evaluation, and shall specifically address any need to expand any needs assessment under W.S.

21-15-117

, to conduct a reassessment of building and facility adequacy or to modify the needs prioritization process.

The commission shall not hinder or curtail the right of a school district to undertake local enhancements to buildings and facilities which are in excess of state building adequacy standards, as permitted by law.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2006, ch. 16, § 1; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; ch. 71, § 1; 2013 ch. 5, § 1, effective February 11, 2013; 2018 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 131, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1 2006, in the introductory language of (b), deleted “as established and existing within the department of education on July 1, 2002, and as updated thereafter until the date of transfer to the commission” at the end of the first sentence, in the second sentence, deleted “for the previous year” following “activities” and “as specified in this act” at the end and made related changes; deleted “and the assessment of building and facility adequacy conducted under subsection (b) of this section” at the end of the first sentence of (c).

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2011, in (b), deleted “In addition to subsection (a) of this section” at the beginning, and substituted “department” for “commission” twice.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, in (c), inserted the present third sentence, added “or to modify the needs prioritization process” at the end, and made related changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2013 amendment,

added “and school levels in accordance with W.S. 21-15-115(e)(iv)” in subd (vi).

Laws 2013, ch. 5 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 11, 2013.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(i), added the second sentence.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "; adequacy assessment" in the section heading; rewrote (a)(v); which read, "Guidelines for adequacy and functionality of educational space for required educational programs"; in (c), substituted "schedules" for "schedule" in the third sentence, in the last sentence, substituted "any" for "the" following "need to expand," and added "under W.S.

21-15-117

."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 131, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b), which read, "The department shall maintain the comprehensive assessment of the adequacy of existing school buildings and facilities and of future space requirements within the state. Maintenance of the assessment shall include district reporting of new construction and major building and facility repair and replacement activities in accordance with guidelines prescribed by rule and regulation of the commission, the results of department on-site visitations and inspections of buildings and facilities and needs assessment data and verification of building and facility ratings through periodic review. The assessment shall be designed and maintained to provide timely and uniform statewide data on all of the following: (i) The condition of school buildings and facilities, seismic ratings and structural integrity. Each school building and facility component or system shall be rated as excellent, good, fair, poor or failure; (ii) School building and facility longevity and space requirements; (iii) Student educational and safety requirements; (iv) The ability to accommodate educational technology; (v) Site requirements of school buildings and facilities; (vi) Inventory of exterior and interior building and facility space."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-15-111(a)(viii).

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 131, § 6, effective July 1, 2004, authorizes the select committee on school facilities to conduct a study of school district enhancements to school buildings and facilities and to provide recommendations on revenue mechanisms available to local districts to fund enhancements and to fund the maintenance of enhancements. The study is to be funded from the appropriation to the legislative service office made under the act.

Legislative intent. —

Legislature required that the Wyoming School Facilities Commission (SFC) to establish and maintain uniform statewide standards for the adequacy of school buildings and facilities and that the SFC make an annual report regarding all aspects of the school facilities needs, including buildings deemed inadequate, expenditures, progress, and upcoming budgetary needs; under the statutory scheme, the legislature provided for capital construction funding from state wealth without reliance upon local wealth as a source of capital, mandated that facilities be remedied to a point requiring only routine maintenance, and made adequacy of the facilities a function of delivering adequate education programs. The legislature has acted to increase the speed of repair or replacement and continues to appropriate large sums; that continued aggressive legislative oversight over capital construction was obtaining results as part of a constitutional statutory scheme to eliminate wealth-based disparities in the state school system.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).